Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.515

Unauthorized assumption of corporate powers.

All persons who assume to act as a corporation without authority so to do shall be jointly and severally liable for all debts and liabilities incurred or arising as a result thereof.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 103.]